Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1734.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; Dennehotso pedestrian path The sum of $5,900,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to the Navajo Nation for surveying, designing, constructing and lighting of a pedestrian path in Dennehotso along U.S. Route 160.